Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Article 1. Student Health.

§ 23.1-800.
Health histories and immunizations required; exemptions.

No full-time student who enrolls for the first time in any baccalaureate public institution of higher education is eligible to register for his second semester or quarter unless he (i) has furnished, before the beginning of the second semester or quarter of enrollment, a health history consistent with guidelines adopted by each institution’s board of visitors that includes documented evidence, provided by a licensed health professional or health facility, of the diseases for which the student has been immunized, the numbers of doses given, the date on which the immunization was administered, and any further immunizations indicated or (ii) objects to such health history requirement on religious grounds, in which case he is exempt from such requirement.

Prior to enrollment for the first time in any baccalaureate public institution of higher education, each student shall be immunized by vaccine against diphtheria, tetanus, poliomyelitis, measles (rubeola), German measles (rubella), and mumps according to the guidelines of the American College Health Association.

Prior to enrollment for the first time in any baccalaureate public institution of higher education, each full-time student shall be vaccinated against meningococcal disease and hepatitis B unless the student or, if the student is a minor, the student’s parent or legal guardian signs a written waiver stating that he has received and reviewed detailed information on the risks associated with meningococcal disease and hepatitis B and the availability and effectiveness of any vaccine and has chosen not to be or not to have the student vaccinated.

Any student is exempt from the immunization requirements set forth in subsections B and C who (i) objects on the grounds that administration of immunizing agents conflicts with his religious tenets or practices, unless the Board of Health has declared an emergency or epidemic of disease, or (ii) presents a statement from a licensed physician that states that his physical condition is such that administration of one or more of the required immunizing agents would be detrimental to his health.

The Board and Commissioner of Health shall cooperate with any board of visitors seeking assistance in the implementation of this section.

The Council shall, in cooperation with the Board and Commissioner of Health, encourage private institutions of higher education to develop a procedure for providing information about the risks associated with meningococcal disease and hepatitis B and the availability and effectiveness of any vaccine against meningococcal disease and hepatitis B.

History.

1986, c. 621, § 23-7.5; 1987, c. 366; 1990, c. 273; 2001, c. 340; 2005, c. 15; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-801.
Educational program on human immunodeficiency virus infection.

Each public institution of higher education, in cooperation with the Department of Health, shall develop and implement educational programs for college students on the etiology, effects, and prevention of infection with human immunodeficiency virus.

History.

1989, c. 613, § 23-9.2:3.2; 1991, c. 590; 2014, c. 484; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-802.
Student mental health; policies; website resource; training.

The governing board of each public institution of higher education shall develop and implement policies that (i) advise students, faculty, and staff, including residence hall staff, of the proper procedures for identifying and addressing the needs of students exhibiting suicidal tendencies or behavior and (ii) provide for training where appropriate. Such policies shall require procedures for notifying the institution’s student health or counseling center for the purposes set forth in subdivision B 5 of §

23.1-1303

when a student exhibits suicidal tendencies or behavior.

The board of visitors of each baccalaureate public institution of higher education shall develop and implement policies that ensure that after a student suicide, affected students have access to reasonable medical and behavioral health services, including postvention services. For the purposes of this subsection, “postvention services” means services designed to facilitate the grieving or adjustment process, stabilize the environment, reduce the risk of negative behaviors, and prevent suicide contagion.

The board of visitors of each baccalaureate public institution of higher education shall establish a written memorandum of understanding with its local community services board or behavioral health authority and with local hospitals and other local mental health facilities in order to expand the scope of services available to students seeking treatment. The memorandum shall designate a contact person to be notified, to the extent allowable under state and federal privacy laws, when a student is involuntarily committed, or when a student is discharged from a facility. The memorandum shall provide for the inclusion of the institution in the post-discharge planning of a student who has been committed and intends to return to campus, to the extent allowable under state and federal privacy laws.

Each baccalaureate public institution of higher education shall create and feature on its website a page with information dedicated solely to the mental health resources available to students at the institution.

Each resident assistant in a student housing facility at a public institution of higher education shall participate in Mental Health First Aid training or a similar program prior to the commencement of his duties.

History.

2007, c. 705, § 23-9.2:8; 2012, cc. 697, 721; 2013, cc. 714, 735; 2014, c. 558, § 23-9.2:14; 2015, cc. 663, 716; 2016, cc. 573, 588, 684; 2017, cc. 296, 691; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 447.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, cc. 573 and
684, amended former § 23-9.2:8, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to
§ 30-152 and Acts
2016, c. 588, cl. 4, the 2016 amendments by cc. 573 and 684 have been given effect in this section by deleting “and consents to such notification” at the end of the second sentence in subsection B.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 296 added subsection E.

The 2017 amendment by c. 691 inserted subsection B and redesignated remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 447, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “subdivision B 5” for “subdivision B 4” in the last sentence of subsection A.